South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4519.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 Statewide Provisions Section 1-1-1910.  A public entity shall not require the disclosure of a person's race on any application for admission or employment. For the purposes of this section a "public entity" means any agency, office, division, or other unit by any name of every agency, office, or department of this State, and all of its political subdivisions, including all institutions of higher learning and public school districts and public charter schools. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----